Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3538.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [120B.111] SEXUAL ORIENTATION OR GENDER IDENTITY. new text end new text begin An individual or group of individuals providing classroom instruction to students at a public school must not engage in classroom discussion or provide classroom instruction regarding sexual orientation or gender identity to students in kindergarten through grade 8. The commissioner must provide schools with guidelines to implement and enforce this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [121A.0655] PARENTAL NOTICE; STUDENT HEALTH AND WELL-BEING. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Parental notice; procedure. new text end new text begin The commissioner must adopt procedures for a public school to notify a student's parent or guardian if there is a change in the student's services or monitoring related to the student's mental, emotional, or physical health or well-being, or a change in the school's ability to provide a safe and supportive learning environment for the student. The procedures must reinforce the fundamental rights of a parent or guardian to make decisions regarding the upbringing and control of their child by requiring school personnel to encourage a student to discuss issues relating to the student's well-being with their parent or guardian or to facilitate discussion of the issue with the parent or guardian. The procedures must not prohibit a parent or guardian from accessing any of their child's education and health records created, maintained, or used by the school district. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Health care services; notice. new text end new text begin At the beginning of the school year, a school board or charter school board of directors must notify parents and guardians of each health care service offered at their child's school and the option to withhold consent to or decline any specific service. Parental consent to a health care service does not waive the parent's or guardian's right to access their child's health records or to be notified about a change in their child's services or monitoring. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Questionnaire or health screening form. new text end new text begin Before administering a student well-being questionnaire or health screening form to a student in kindergarten through grade 8, a school board or charter school board must provide the questionnaire or health screening form to the student's parent or guardian and obtain the parent's or guardian's prior written permission to administer the questionnaire or form. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Prohibited procedures. new text end new text begin A school board or charter school board of directors must not adopt procedures that prohibit school employees from notifying a parent or guardian about their child's mental, emotional, or physical health or well-being, or a change in related services or monitoring, or that encourage or have the effect of encouraging a student to withhold such information from a parent or guardian. A school employee must not discourage or prohibit parental notification of and involvement in critical decisions affecting a student's mental, emotional, or physical health or well-being. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Principal notification; parent concern; appeal. new text end new text begin (a) A school board or charter school board of directors must adopt procedures for a parent or guardian to notify the school principal, or their designee, regarding the process for resolving concerns. The concerns must be resolved within seven calendar days after the parental notification. If the concern remains unresolved within 30 calendar days after the parental notification to the principal, the school board or charter school board of directors must either resolve the concern or provide a statement of the reasons for not resolving the concern. new text end new text begin (b) Within 30 calendar days following the local board's decision or statement under paragraph (a), a parent or guardian may: new text end new text begin (1) file an appeal of the decision or a complaint with the commissioner of education. The commissioner must determine facts relating to the dispute over the district's or charter school's practice or procedure, consider information provided by the district or charter school, and provide a recommended decision for resolution to the school board or charter school board of directors within 30 days after receipt of the appeal; or new text end new text begin (2) bring an action against the school board or charter school board of directors to obtain a declaratory judgment that the board's procedure or practice violates this section and seek injunctive relief. A court may award damages and must award reasonable attorney fees and court costs to a parent or guardian who receives declaratory or injunctive relief. new text end new text begin (c) A school board or charter school board of directors must adopt policies to notify parents and guardians of the procedures available under this section. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for the 2026-2027 school year and later. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin GRANT PROGRAM; FIREARMS SAFETY, ARCHERY, HUNTING, AND ANGLING IN SCHOOL PHYSICAL EDUCATION COURSES.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Program. new text end new text begin The commissioner of natural resources must create a grant program to increase firearms safety, trap shooting, archery, hunting, and angling activities in physical education courses in Minnesota school districts. A school must ensure that activities funded under the program are consistent with required state standards for physical education. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligibility. new text end new text begin (a) A school district or American Indian-controlled Tribal contract or grant school must apply to the commissioner of natural resources to participate in the program in the form and manner determined by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must seek geographic balance among schools selected for participation. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Report. new text end new text begin By January 15, 2027, the commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over kindergarten through grade 12 education and natural resources finance and policy. The report must be in writing and must report on activities funded by the grant program and program outcomes. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin (a) $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of natural resources to implement the program under this section. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end new text begin (b) Money appropriated for the program may be used for Department of Natural Resources personnel costs, curriculum development, reporting costs, school staff training, outdoor sports licenses for participating students, and equipment used in courses. new text end